Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-1250.01
Cash funds deposited with fiscal agent; constitute investment made by state investment officer.

Whenever cash funds belonging to the State of Nebraska shall be deposited with any fiscal agent authorized by section 72-1250, the holding thereof shall be and constitute an investment made pursuant to direction of the state investment officer for purposes of subdivision (7) of section 84-602.

Laws 1974, LB 925, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB509, § 8.

State Treasurer, duties, see section 84-602.